Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 98. ARKANSAS MEDICAL MARIJUANA AMENDMENT OF 2016.
§
16. Failure to adopt rules or issue registry identification cards or licenses.

If the Department of Health, Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, or Medical Marijuana Commission fails to adopt rules to implement this amendment within the time prescribed or fails to issue the minimum number of dispensary licenses or cultivation facility licenses, any person who would be a qualifying patient under this amendment may commence a mandamus action in Pulaski County Circuit Court to compel the department, division, or commission to perform the actions mandated under the provisions of this amendment.

§
17. Taxation and distribution of proceeds.

The sale of usable marijuana is subject to all state and local sales taxes at the same rate as other tangible personal property.

The sale of usable marijuana is also subject to the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Special Privilege Tax Act of 2017, § 26-57-1501 et seq., or its successor.

The state sales and special privilege tax revenues received by the Department of Finance and Administration from the sale of usable marijuana under this amendment shall be distributed as follows:

All moneys received as part of this amendment are designated as special revenue and the funds collected shall be deposited into the State Treasury and credited to the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Implementation and Operations Fund;

All moneys received as part of this amendment prior to the effective date of this section shall be immediately transferred to the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Implementation and Operations Fund upon the effective date of this section;

In order for the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to determine the expenses that state agencies incurred due to the passage of this amendment, the following state entities shall submit a report to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State no later than May 1 of each year of the projected expenses for the next fiscal year, including without limitation expenses as set out in subdivision (b)(4) of this section:

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration;

The Department of Health;

The Medical Marijuana Commission; and

Any other state agency that incurs implementation, administration, or enforcement expenses related to this amendment; and

From time to time, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and those of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State the amounts as set out in subdivision (b)(3) of this section or so much as is available in proportion to the amount identified by each agency in subdivision (b)(3) of this section from the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Implementation and Operations Fund to the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account for the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer for the Department of Health, the Medical Marijuana Commission Fund, and any other fund necessary to the implementation, administration, or enforcement of this amendment to pay for or reimburse personal services, operating expenses, professional fees, equipment, monitoring, auditing, and other miscellaneous expenses of this amendment.

At the end of each fiscal year, any unobligated balances of the amounts transferred shall be deducted from the amount transferred in the next fiscal year as authorized in subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section.

Any unanticipated expenses or expenses over the amount transferred may be added from time to time to the transfer amount authorized in subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall report at the end of the fiscal year to the Legislative Council, or to the Joint Budget Committee if during a legislative session, the following information:

The total annual amount received as a result of this amendment;

The amount transferred to each agency; and

Copies of the report submitted to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State identifying estimated expenses as set out in subdivision (b)(3) of this section.

After the transfer described in subsection (b) of this section, the amounts remaining in the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Implementation and Operations Fund shall be distributed one hundred percent (100%) to the General Revenue Fund Account.

An entity receiving a grant of state sales tax revenue under subsection (b) of this section may make one (1) or more successive grant applications for the same project or projects. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 670, § 1; 2017, No. 1098, § 1; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 7; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 7.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 670, § 4, provided: “Review distribution of proceeds.

During the 2019 General Session of the General Assembly, the General Assembly shall:

“(1)

Review and reexamine the distribution of the proceeds received from medical marijuana under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, also known as the ‘Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016’; and

“(2)

Consider redirecting the proceeds or a portion of the proceeds received from medical marijuana under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, also known as the ‘Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016’, to workforce education within the state.”

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 670 rewrote (b); inserted present (c); and redesignated former (c) as (d).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1098 redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); substituted “tangible personal property” for “goods” in (a)(1); added (a)(2); and substituted “The state sales and special privilege” for “The states sales” in the introductory language of (b).

The 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 1 and 8 redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); substituted “tangible personal property” for “goods” in (a)(1); added (a)(2); rewrote (b); inserted present (c); and redesignated former (c) as (d).

§
18. Costs of administration and regulation of amendment.

The following funds shall be used by the Department of Health to perform its duties under this amendment:

State sales tax revenues received under § 17 of this amendment;

The revenue generated from fees, penalties, and other assessments of the department provided for by this amendment, including without limitation:

Registry identification card application and renewal fees; and

Fees for replacement registry identification cards.

Revenue generated from fees, penalties, and other assessments under this amendment shall be used solely for the performance of the department's duties under this amendment and shall be used for no other purpose;

Private donations, if such funds are available; and

Other appropriations by the General Assembly, if such funds are available.

The following funds shall be used by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to perform its duties under this amendment:

State sales tax revenues received under § 17 of this amendment;

The revenue generated from fees, penalties, and other assessments of the division provided for by this amendment.

Revenue generated from fees, penalties, and other assessments of the division under this amendment shall be used solely for the performance of the division's duties under this amendment and shall be used for no other purpose;

Private donations, if such funds are available; and

Other appropriations by the General Assembly, if such funds are available.

The following funds shall be used by the Medical Marijuana Commission to perform its duties under this amendment:

State sales tax revenues received under § 17 of this amendment;

The revenue generated from fees, penalties, and other assessments of the commission provided for by this amendment, including without limitation dispensary and cultivation facility application fees, licensing fees, and renewal fees;

Private donations, if such funds are available; and

Other appropriations by the General Assembly, if such funds are available.

§
19. Medical Marijuana Commission — Creation.

There is created a Medical Marijuana Commission within the Department of Finance and Administration to determine the qualifications for receiving a license to operate a dispensary or a license to operate a cultivation facility and the awarding of licenses.

Each member of the commission shall serve a term of four (4) years.

The commission shall consist of five (5) members as follows:

Two (2) members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

Two (2) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

One (1) member appointed by the Governor.

Vacancies on the commission shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment.

The commission shall select one (1) of its members as chair.

An affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum present shall be necessary to transact business.

One (1) of the initial members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall serve a term of two (2) years and one (1) of the initial members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall serve a term of four (4) years.

The initial members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall draw lots to determine which member shall serve a term of two (2) years.

One (1) of the initial members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve a term of two (2) years and one (1) of the initial members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve a term of four (4) years.

The initial members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall draw lots to determine which member shall serve a term of two (2) years.

The initial member appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of four (4) years.

All subsequent persons appointed to the commission shall serve a term of four (4) years.

A member of the commission shall be:

A citizen of the United States;

A resident of the State of Arkansas for at least ten (10) years preceding his or her appointment;

A qualified elector;

At least twenty-five (25) years of age; and

Have no economic interest in a dispensary or cultivation facility.

The commission, by a majority vote of the total membership of the commission cast during its first regularly scheduled meeting of each calendar year, may authorize payment to its members of a stipend not to exceed eighty-five dollars ($85.00) per day for each meeting attended or for any day while performing any proper business of the commission.

Members of the commission shall receive no other compensation, expense reimbursement, or in-lieu-of payments.

The commission may employ staff necessary to assist in the performance of its duties under this amendment.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall provide staff for the commission if the commission does not have employees available for that purpose.

Initial members of the commission shall be appointed within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this section.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall call the first meeting of the commission, which shall occur within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of this section. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 638, § 1.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “within the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(1).

§
20. No implied repeal.

By adoption of this amendment, there is no implied repeal of the existing Arkansas laws criminalizing possession of marijuana for purposes not specified in this amendment.

This amendment acknowledges that marijuana use, possession, and distribution for any purpose remains illegal under federal law.

§
21. Limitation on growing.

This amendment:

Authorizes the growing of marijuana at a dispensary or cultivation facility that is properly licensed with the state; and

Does not authorize a qualifying patient, designated caregiver, or other person to grow marijuana.

§
22. Severabillty.

If any provision or section of this amendment or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or application of the amendment that can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this amendment are declared to be severable.

§
23. Amendment by General Assembly.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the General Assembly, in the same manner as required for amendment of laws initiated by the people, may amend the sections of this amendment so long as the amendments are germane to this section and consistent with its policy and purposes.

The General Assembly shall not amend the following provisions of this amendment:

Subsections (a), (b), and (c) of § 3;

Subsection (h), (i), and (j) of § 8; and

Section 23.

§
24. Licensure for transporters, distributers, and processers.

The Medical Marijuana Commission shall license transporters, distributors, and processers.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall administer and enforce the provisions of this section concerning transporters, distributers, and processors.

The owners, board members, or officers of a transporter, distributor, or processor shall not:

Have been convicted of an excluded felony offense;

Have previously been an owner of a dispensary, cultivation facility, transporter, distributor, or processor that has had a license revoked; and

Be under twenty-one (21) years of age.

The commission may conduct a criminal records check in order to carry out this section.

A transporter license, distributor license, and processor license shall expire one (1) year after the date of issuance.

The commission shall issue a renewal license within ten (10) days to any entity who complies with the requirements contained in this amendment, including without limitation the payment of a renewal fee.

The commission may charge a reasonable fee as established by rule for the issuance of an initial license and a renewal license.

A transporter or distributer licensed under this section may:

Acquire, possess, deliver, transfer, transport, or distribute marijuana to a dispensary, cultivation facility, or processor; and

Receive compensation for providing services allowed by this section.

A transporter or distributor licensed under this section shall not grow, manufacture, process, prepare, supply, or dispense marijuana.

A processer licensed under this section may:

Acquire, possess, manufacture, process, prepare, deliver, transport, and supply marijuana to a dispensary or cultivation facility; and

Receive compensation for providing services allowed by this section.

A processer licensed under this section shall not grow or dispense marijuana.

The division may make reasonable inspections on a transporter, distributer, and processor to ensure that the transporter, distributor, and processer:

Is an entity incorporated in the State of Arkansas;

Has implemented appropriate security measures to deter and prevent unauthorized entrance into areas containing marijuana and the theft of marijuana;

Conducts an initial comprehensive inventory of all marijuana and a biannual comprehensive inventory of all marijuana; and

Records each transaction between the transporter, distributer, or processer and a dispensary, cultivation facility, or another processer and maintains the records for three (3) years;

Has adopted procedures to ensure accurate recordkeeping.

The commission shall adopt rules governing the applications for a transporter license, distributor license, or processer license.

The division shall adopt rules governing:

Oversight requirements for transporters, distributers, and processers;

Recordkeeping requirements for transporters, distributers, and processers;

Security requirements for transporters, distributers, and processers;

Personnel requirements for transporters, distributers, and processers;

The manufacture, processing, packaging, and dispensing of usable marijuana to qualifying patients and designated caregivers;

Procedures for suspending or terminating the licenses of transporters, distributers, and processers that violate the provisions of this amendment or the rules adopted under this amendment, procedures for appealing penalties, and a schedule of penalties;

Procedures for inspections and investigations of transporters, distributers, and processers;

Advertising restrictions for transporters, distributers, and processers; and

(J)

Any other matters necessary to the fair, impartial, stringent, and comprehensive administration of the duties of the division under this section. [As added by Acts 2017, No. 642, § 3.]

Publisher's Notes.

As added by Acts 2017, No. 642, § 3, this section does not contain a subdivision (h)(2)(I).

§
25. Registration and certification of transporter agents, distributer agents, and processor agents.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall:

License transporter agents, distributor agents, and processer agents; and

Administer and enforce the provisions of this section concerning transporter agents, distributer agents, and processor agents.

The division may conduct criminal records checks in order to carry out this section.

Except as prohibited by subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the division shall issue each transporter agent, distributer agent, and processor agent a registry identification card within ten (10) days of receipt of:

The person's name, address, and date of birth under this amendment; and

A reasonable fee in an amount established by rule for the division.

The division shall not issue a registry identification card to a transporter agent, distributer agent, or processor agent who has been convicted of an excluded felony offense.

The division may conduct a criminal background check of each transporter agent, distributer agent, and processor agent in order to carry out this provision.

The division shall notify the transporter, distributer, or processer in writing of the reason for denying the registry identification card.

A registry identification card for a transporter agent, distributer agent, or processor agent shall expire one (1) year after the date of issuance.

A registry identification card of a transporter agent, distributer agent, or processor agent expires upon notification to the division by a dispensary or cultivation facility that the person ceases to work at the transporter, distributer, or processer.

The division may charge a reasonable fee as established by rule for the issuance of a new, renewal, or replacement registry identification card.

The division may revoke the registry identification card of a transporter agent, distributer agent, or processor agent who knowingly violates any provision of this amendment, and the cardholder is subject to any other penalties established by law for the violation.

The division may revoke or suspend the transporter license, distributor license, or processer license of a transporter, distributer, or processer that the division determines knowingly aided or facilitated a violation of any provision of this amendment, and the cardholder is subject to any other penalties established in law for the violation.

The division shall adopt rules governing:

The manner in which the division considers applications for and renewals of registry identification cards for transporter agents, distributor agents, and processer agents;

The form and content of registration and renewal applications for transporter agents, distributor agents, and processer agents;

Procedures for suspending or terminating the registration of transporter agents, distributor agents, and processer agents who violate the provisions of this section or the rules adopted under this section, procedures for appealing penalties, and a schedule of penalties; and

Any other matters necessary for the fair, impartial, stringent, and comprehensive administration of the duties of the division under this section. [As added by Acts 2017, No. 642, § 3.]

§
26. Acts amending Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016.

If an act of the General Assembly amends one (1) or more sections of this amendment under § 23 of this amendment, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may, by a majority vote of the commission, make the following revisions to the act so long as the revisions do not change the substance or meaning of the act:

Correct the spelling of words;

Change capitalization for the purpose of uniformity;

Correct manifest typographical and grammatical errors;

Correct manifest errors in references to laws and other documents;

Correct manifest errors in internal reference numbers;

Number, renumber, redesignate, and rearrange the provisions of this amendment at issue;

Change internal reference numbers to agree with renumbered sections, subsections, subdivisions, or other provisions of law;

Insert or delete hyphens in words to follow correct grammatical usage;

Change numerals or symbols to words or vice versa and add figures or words if they are merely repetitions of written words or vice versa for purposes of uniformity and style;

Change the form of nouns, pronouns, and verbs for purposes of style and grammar;

Correct punctuation; and

Change gender-specific language to gender-neutral language.

If more than one (1) act amending a section of this amendment under § 23 of this amendment is enacted by the General Assembly during the same session, the commission may, by a majority vote of the commission, revise this amendment as necessary so that all of the enactments shall be given effect, including without limitation renumbering, redesignating, and rearranging sections, subsections, and subdivisions of this amendment.

In the event that one (1) or more acts amending a section of this amendment under § 23 of this amendment result in an irreconcilable conflict with one (1) or more acts amending a section of this amendment enacted during the same session, the commission may, by a majority vote of the commission, revise this amendment so that the conflicting provision of the last enactment prevails.

If the commission makes revisions under subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall file a report with the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Governor that:

Explains the revisions made under subsection (a) of this section; and

Includes the text of this amendment as amended by the revisions made under subsection (a) of this section. [As added by Acts 2019, No. 694, § 6.]